Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.301

Election to transfer public employees' retirement system service credit—Certain employees providing nursing care.

(1) An employee of an employer as defined in RCW 41.37.010(12) who was a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 before January 1, 2019, and on January 1, 2019, meets the eligibility requirements as set forth in RCW 41.37.010(19) has the following options during the election period defined in subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Remain in the public employees' retirement system; or

(b) Become a member of the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2 and be a dual member as provided in chapter 41.54 RCW, and public employees' retirement system service credit may not be transferred to the public safety employees' retirement system.

(2) The "election period" is the period between January 1, 2019, and March 1, 2019.

(3) During the election period, employees who are employed by an employer as defined in RCW 41.37.010(12) remain members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 until they elect to join the public safety employees' retirement system. Members who elect to join the public safety employees' retirement system as described in this section will have their membership begin prospectively from the date of their election.

(4) If after March 1, 2019, the member has not made an election to join the public safety employees' retirement system, he or she will remain in the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3.

(5) An employee who was a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on or before January 1, 2019, and on or after January 1, 2019, is employed by an employer as defined in RCW 41.37.010(12) as an employee who meets the eligibility requirements included in RCW 41.37.010(19), shall remain a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 1.

(6) All new employees hired on or after January 1, 2019, who become employed by an employer as defined in RCW 41.37.010(12) as an employee who meets the eligibility requirements included in RCW 41.37.010(19) will become members of the public safety employees' retirement system.

[ 2018 c 241 s 2.]